test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-list_dift_ad_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - list: # from dictionary
  
    aiccâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: aaicâm
    aiccâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: áiccá
    cieggâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ciegâm
    ciellâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cielâm
    cieppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cievâm
    hiettâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hieđâm
    huollâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: huolâm
    jielttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jiälttá
    juoigâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: juoigâm
    juottâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: juotâm
    juovdâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: juovdâm
    juoŋŋâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: juáŋá
    kaidâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kaaidâm
    kieimâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kieimâm
    kiellâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kielâm
    kiellâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kiälá
    kierdâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kierdâm
    kiessâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kiesâm
    kietkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kieđhâm
    kuohâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuovâm
    kuoirâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuoirâm
    kuokkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuohâm
    kuoppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuovâm
    kuorbâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuorbâm
    kuorrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuorâm
    kuorssâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuorsâm
    kuorssâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuársá
    kuoskâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuoskâm
    kuossâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuosâm
    kuovlâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuovlâm
    kuovzâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuovzâm
    kuovzâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuávzá
    laimâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: laaimâm
    laimâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: láimá
    liennjâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lienjâm
    liennjâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: liänjá
    loigâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: looigâm
    luobdâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: luobdâm
    luohčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: luovčâm
    luoikkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: luoihâm
    luoimâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: luoimâm
    luoppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: luovâm
    maizâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: maaizâm
    miehâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: mievâm
    mieigâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: mieigâm
    mieskâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: mieskâm
    mieskâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: miäská
    miestâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: miestâm
    miestâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: miästá
    miettâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: mieđâm
    muollâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: muálá
    muovlâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: muovlâm
    nievdâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nievdâm
    njieccâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njiesâm
    njiellâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njielâm
    njiellâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njiälá
    njuobžâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njuábžá
    njuoccâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njuosâm
    njuoccâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njuácá
    njuolgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njuolgâm
    njuolgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njuálgá
    njuordâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njuordâm
    njuorrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njuorâm
    njuoskâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njuoskâm
    njuoskâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njuáská
    njuottâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njuođâm
    njuovvâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njuovâm
    njuovvâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njuává
    noigâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nooigâm
    nuollâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nuolâm
    nuorbâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nuárbá
    paimâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: paaimâm
    pieijâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: piejâm
    pieijâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: joton
    pieijâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jurdui
    pieijâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: meddâl
    pieijâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: piäjá
    piemmâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: piemâm
    piemmâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: piämmá
    pievlâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: piävlá
    pieđđâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pieđâm
    poigâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: paiga
    puoccâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: puosâm
    puoccâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: puácá
    puohčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: puovčâm
    puovŋâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: puovŋâm
    raigâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: raaigâm
    riehkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: riehkâm
    riemmâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: riemâm
    riemmâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: riämá
    rievdâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rievdâm
    rievdâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: riävdá
    ruoinâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruoinâm
    ruokkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruohâm
    ruokkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ruákká
    ruoppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruovâm
    ruossâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruosâm
    ruottâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruotâm
    ruovgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruovgâm
    ruoškâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ruášká
    ruoččâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruojâm
    ruoččâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ruájá
    sierrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sierâm
    sierrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: siärá
    sierŋâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: siärŋá
    smiettâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: smietâm
    smiettâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: smiättá
    snuollâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: snuolâm
    soinâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sooinâm
    soinâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: saina
    stoigâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: stooigâm
    suoskâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suoskâm
    suoskâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suáská
    suossâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suásá
    suovvâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suovâm
    suovvâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suává
    suoččâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suáčá
    suođđâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suáđá
    taibâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: taaibâm
    taibâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: táibá
    taigâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: taaigâm
    taigâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: táigá
    teivâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: teeivâm
    teivâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tiäivá
    tiellâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tiälá
    tievvâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tiävá
    toimâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tooimâm
    toimâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuáimá
    tuoibâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuoibâm
    tuoibâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuáibá
    tuoldâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuoldâm
    tuoldâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuáldá
    tuolmâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuolmâm
    tuolvâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuolvâm
    tuolvâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuálvá
    tuoppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuovâm
    tuorrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuorâm
    tuorrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuárá
    tuossâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuosâm
    tuostâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuostâm
    tuostâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuástá
    tuovŋâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuovŋâm
    tuovŋâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuávŋá
    uigâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: uuigâm
    vaibâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vaaibâm
    vaibâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: váibá
    viennâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vienâm
    viennâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: viäná
    vierrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vierâm
    vierrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vierâi
    viessâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: viesâm
    vieškâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vieškâm
    vieškâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: viäšká
    viežžâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: viežâm
    vuoidâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuoidâm
    vuoijâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuojâm
    vuoijâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuájá
    vuoiŋâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuoiŋâm
    vuoiŋâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuáiŋá
    vuollâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuolâm
    vuorjâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuorjâm
    vuorrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuorâm
    vuorrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuárá
    vuoššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuošâm
    čiehâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čievâm
    čiehâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čiähá
    čiehčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čievčâm
    čielgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čiälgá
    čieppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čiepâm
    čieppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čiäppá
    čieskâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čieskâm
    šiettâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: šietâm
    šiettâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šiättá
    šlieđđâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: šlieđâm
    šuimâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: šuuimâm
    čuoccâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuosâm
    čuoccâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuácá
    čuohâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuovâm
    čuoigâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuoigâm
    čuoigâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuáigá
    čuoijâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuojâm
    čuoijâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuájá
    čuollâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuolâm
    čuolmâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuolmâm
    čuolmâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuálmá
    čuoppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuopâm
    čuovvâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuovâm
    čuovvâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuává
    šuoŋŋâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šuáŋá
